Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.030

Composition—Appointments—Qualifications—Terms—Vacancies.

The initial composition of the optometry board includes the three members of the examining committee for optometry plus two more optometrists to be appointed by the governor.

The governor must make all appointments to the optometry board. Only optometrists who are residents of this state, having been licensed to practice and practicing optometry in this state for a period of at least four years immediately preceding the effective date of appointment, and who have no connection with any optical supply business may be appointed.

All appointments are for three years.

In addition to the members specified in this section, the governor shall appoint a consumer member of the board, who shall serve for a term of three years.

In the event that a vacancy occurs on the board in the middle of an appointee's term, the governor must appoint a successor for the unexpired portion of the term only.

[ 2022 c 240 s 23; 2011 c 336 s 489; 1984 c 279 s 54; 1963 c 25 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.